Illinois, session 104th, HB766.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Network Adequacy and Transparency Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 124/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Network Adequacy and Transparency Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-502, eff. 9-15-17.)